Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 4 Board of Control; Adjudication of Water Rights

Cross references. —

As to construction of Glendo Reservoir and storage of water by United States, see §

41-1-101

.

As to supervision of delivery of foreign waters, see §

41-3-204

.

As to irrigation and drainage districts generally, see §§

41-6-101

through

41-6-105

and

41-6-120

through

41-6-507

.

For constitutional provision relative to irrigation and water rights generally, see Wyo. Const. art. 8, §§ 1 through 5.

As to power of municipal corporations relative to the acquisition of water rights, see Wyo. Const. art. 13, § 5.

As to construction and improvement of works for conservation and utilization of water, see Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 10.

As to adjudication of water rights under Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, see §

1-37-106

.

For duty of stock drover to prevent his livestock from trespassing upon property of another or from injuring any irrigation ditch or public works, see §

11-20-119

.

For duty of companies, corporations, etc., operating or maintaining ditches, canals or water courses, not being a natural stream, for irrigation or other purposes, to construct and maintain bridges at road crossing, see §

24-1-113

.

As to public health and safety relating to water, see title 35.

Law reviews. —

For case notes, “Water Law—Indian Law—Cowboys, Indians and Reserved
Water Rights: May a State Court Limit How Indian Tribes Use Their
Water?
In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 467 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

78 Am. Jur. 2d Waters § 1 et seq.

93 C.J.S. Waters § 1 et seq.